Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 2632, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 129, O.S.L. 2025 (70 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 2632), is amended to read as follows:
Section 2632. A. To be eligible for an Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant, a student shall:
1. Be an Oklahoma resident as defined by the Oklahoma State
Regents for Higher Education;

Req. No. 16840 Page 1

2. Have enrolled as a full-time undergraduate student in an
eligible institution of higher education as prescribed in subsection
D of this section;
3. Meet the income eligibility level, which is the student's
parents' income from taxable sources which shall not be more than
Fifty Eighty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00) ($80,000.00) per year or
the student's income if the student is independent and self-
supporting as determined by the State Regents consistent with
federal financial aid regulations;
4. Pay more tuition than is required at a comparable public
institution of higher education and pay no less than the regular
tuition required of all students enrolled at the institution where
the student is enrolled; and
5. Maintain at least minimum standards of academic performance
as required by the enrolling institution.
B. The enrolling institution shall forward a completed student
application, documentation of full-time enrollment status, and
certification of resident status to the State Regents no later than
October 15 for the fall semester and March 15 for the spring
semester of each academic year.
C. Subject to the availability of funds in the Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant Trust Fund, an Oklahoma Tuition Equalization
Grant in the amount of Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00) per academic
year, or One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) per academic semester
Req. No. 16840 Page 2

shal l be awarded by the State Regents by allocation from the
Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grant Trust Fund, beginning with
eligible students enrolled in the 2003-2004 school year. No grants
pursuant to this act shall be provided to students for attending
summer terms or intersessions.
D. The State Regents shall implement policies and procedures
for the administration of this act. The State Regents shall approve
as eligible institutions of higher education only those private or
independent, not-for-profit colleges or universities that are
domiciled within this state, meet approved program and accreditation
standards as determined by the State Regents, and are fully
accredited by the Higher Learning Commission of the North Central
Association on Colleges and Schools or a national accrediting body
recognized by the United States Department of Education. To be
eligible, institutions must have been granted not-for-profit status
by the Internal Revenue Service and the U. S. U.S. Department of
Education prior to July 1, 2012. Additionally, eligible
institutions shall adhere to the complaint process policies and
procedures administered by the State Regents. The State Regents
shall review and take action, as authorized, on complaints
concerning eligible institutions. The eligible institutions shall
include Family of Faith College, Mid-America Christian University,
Oklahoma Baptist University, Oklahoma Christian University, Oklahoma
City University, Oklahoma Wesleyan University, Oral Roberts
Req. No. 16840 Page 3

Univ ersity, Southern Nazarene University, Southwestern Christian
University, the University of Tulsa and Randall University.
E. If funds are not sufficient in the Oklahoma Tuition
Equalization Grant Trust Fund to provide grants for all eligible
applicants, the State Regents shall award grants on the basis of
need and take into consideration other grants and scholarships
received by an eligible applicant when awarding grants. Students
who have previously received a tuition equalization grant and who
continue to meet the requirements for eligibility shall have
absolute priority for continued financial support superior to any
student who is applying for a grant for the first time.
F. Students enrolling as first-time freshmen for the 2003-2004
school year shall be the first class of students eligible to apply
for Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grants. In subsequent years, all
previously eligible students and the first-time enrolling freshmen
students shall be entitled to apply for a grant pursuant to this
section. Beginning in the 2007-2008 school year, all eligible
students shall be entitled to apply for a grant pursuant to this
section.
G. A grant provided by this section shall not only be allowed
for courses or other postsecondary units taken in excess of the
requirements programs offered at eligible institutions of higher
education as prescribed in subsection D of the section for
completion of a baccalaureate program or taken more than five (5)
Req. No. 16840 Page 4

year s after the student's first grant is received. The State
Regents may award an Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grant for courses
of postsecondary units taken more than five (5) years after the
student's first grant is received only in hardship circumstances.
No Oklahoma Tuition Equalization Grant recipient may receive
benefits beyond a cumulative time period of five (5) years.
H. On or before February 1 after the first semester in which
grants are awarded pursuant to this act and every year thereafter,
the State Regents shall provide a report to the Governor, President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of
Representatives to include, but not be limited to the number of
students awarded grants, grade point average, persistence rates,
degree completion rates, demographic data, and any other indicators
the State Regents deem appropriate.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

60-2-16840 AQH 02/27/26



Req. No. 16840 Page 5